Vermont statutes. Title 22 Libraries, History, and Information Technology
Subchapter 1. Free Public Library Service

§§ 61-66.
Repealed.
1969, No. 226 (Adj. Sess.), § 18, eff. March 31, 1970.

§ 67.
Public libraries; statement of policy; use of facilities and resources.

The General Assembly declares it to be the policy of the State of Vermont that free public libraries are essential to the general enlightenment of citizens in a democracy and that every citizen of the State of Vermont should have access to the educational, cultural, recreational, informational, and research benefits of a free public library.

The trustees, managers, or directors of a public library may use library resources as a community center. Community centers may serve as forums and exhibition areas for the exchange of ideas that encourage the growth of artistic, educational, literary, and scientific knowledge as well as the intercultural understanding of the Vermont citizenry. Public libraries may cooperate with community groups to provide these services.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 73

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 68.
Statutory purposes.

The statutory purpose of the exemption for libraries in section 109 of this title is to aid libraries in offering free and public access to information and research resources.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 12.